Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4126.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "nuclear and hydrogen education grant program fund act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Department", "postsecondary school", and "qualified education program" mean those terms as defined in the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program act. (b) "Fund" means the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program fund created in section 3. Sec. 3. (1) The nuclear and hydrogen education grant program fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year does not lapse to the general fund. (4) The department is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (5) The department shall expend money from the fund on appropriation, only for the purpose of awarding grants to postsecondary schools that seek to establish or expand qualified education programs, as described in section 4 of the nuclear and hydrogen education grant program act. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 4124 (request no. H00154'25). (b) House Bill No. 4127 (request no. H00155'25). (c) House Bill No. 4129 (request no. H00156'25). (d) House Bill No. 4125 (request no. H00157'25). (e) House Bill No. 4128 (request no. H01460'25).